District of Columbia statutes.
38-1419

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

The term “full-time students” means students pursuing a full-time course of study in an accredited school of medicine or school of dentistry leading to a degree of Doctor of Medicine, Doctor of Dentistry, or an equivalent degree.

(2)

The terms “school of medicine” and “school of dentistry” mean a school in the District of Columbia which provides training leading, respectively, to a degree of Doctor of Medicine and Doctor of Dentistry, or an equivalent degree, and which is accredited by a recognized body or bodies approved for such purpose by the Secretary of Education of the United States.

(3)

The term “nonprofit” as applied to a school of medicine or a school of dentistry means one which is owned and operated by 1 or more corporations or associations no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

History

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1325, Pub. L. 91-650, title III, § 310

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1719.
1973 Ed., § 31-929.

References in Text

“Secretary of Education” was substituted for “Commissioner of Education” in paragraph (2) of this section pursuant to § 301 of the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 96-88.